California statutes. Education Code
(6) (A) Establish minimum conditions entitling districts to receive state aid for support of community colleges. In so doing, the board of governors shall establish and carry out a periodic review of each community college district to determine whether it has met the minimum conditions prescribed by the board of governors.

(B) In determining whether a community college district satisfies the minimum conditions established pursuant to this section, the board of governors shall review the regional accreditation status of the community colleges within that district.

(7) Coordinate and encourage interdistrict, regional, and statewide development of community college programs, facilities, and services.

(8) Facilitate articulation with other segments of higher education with secondary education.

(9) Review and approve comprehensive plans for each community college district. The plans shall be submitted to the board of governors by the governing board of each community college district.

(10) Review and approve all educational programs offered by community college districts and all courses that are not offered as part of an educational program approved by the board of governors.

(11) Exercise general supervision over the formation of new community college districts and the reorganization of existing community college districts, including the approval or disapproval of plans therefor.

(12) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, be solely
 responsible for establishing, maintaining, revising, and updating, as necessary, the uniform budgeting and accounting structures and procedures for the California Community Colleges.

(13) Establish policies regarding interdistrict attendance of students.

(14) Advise and assist governing boards of community college districts on the implementation and interpretation of state and federal laws affecting community colleges.

(15) Contract for the procurement of goods and services, as necessary.

(16) Carry out other functions as expressly provided by law.

(c) Subject to, and in furtherance of, subdivision (a), the board of governors shall have full authority to adopt rules and regulations
 necessary and proper to execute the functions specified in this section as well as other functions that the board of governors is expressly authorized by statute to regulate.

(d) Wherever in this section or any other statute a power is vested in the board of governors, the board of governors, by a majority vote, may adopt a rule delegating that power to the chancellor, or any officer, employee, or committee of the California Community Colleges, or community college district, as the board of governors may designate. However, the board of governors shall not delegate any power that is expressly made nondelegable by statute. Any rule delegating power shall prescribe the limits of delegation.

(e) In performing the functions specified in this section, the board of governors shall establish and carry out a process for consultation with institutional representatives of community college
 districts so as to ensure their participation in the development and review of policy proposals. The consultation process shall also afford community college organizations, as well as interested individuals and parties, an opportunity to review and comment on proposed policy before it is adopted by the board of governors.

(f) (1) The board of governors shall administer the online community college established pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 75001. In its capacity as the governing board of the online community college, the board of governors shall carry out the functions specified in Section 75003. Members of the board of governors shall receive their actual and necessary traveling expenses while on official business. Each member shall also receive one hundred dollars ($100) for each day he or she is attending to official business.

(2) (A) The board of governors shall contract with a community college district board of trustees for purposes of establishing a separate collective bargaining agreement with employees of the online community college pursuant to the Educational Employment Relations Act established in Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code. The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall designate the contract community college district. Employees represented by the collective bargaining agreement established pursuant to this paragraph shall be recruited, recommended for hire, and assigned and directed by the chief executive officer of the online community college appointed pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 75005.

(B) Notwithstanding subdivision (d) of Section 75007, the contract entered into pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall be exempt from any provision of law relating to competitive
 bidding, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services. For only the contract, or contracts, applicable to subparagraph (A) the chancellor’s office shall also be exempt from the requirements of Article 6 (commencing with Section 999) of Chapter 6 of Division 4 of the Military and Veterans Code and Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(C) The chief executive officer of the online college or his or her designee shall participate in the collective bargaining process pursuant to subparagraph (A).

(3) The chief executive officer of the online college shall clarify the identity of the employer of record for all staff of the online college.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 33, Sec. 16.   (AB 1809)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

70901.1.

The Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges shall adopt regulations that permit the governing board of a community college district to allow applications for admission, student residency determination forms, and other documents to be submitted electronically. The regulations shall require that applicants and students be informed of the relative security of the information they submit electronically.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 654, Sec. 1.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

70901.2.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, when a classified staff representative is to serve on a college or district task force, committee, or other governance group, the exclusive representative of classified employees of that college or district shall appoint the representative for the respective bargaining unit members. The exclusive representative of the classified employees and the local governing board may mutually agree to an alternative appointment process through a memorandum of understanding. A local governing board may consult with other organizations of classified employees on shared governance issues that are outside the scope of bargaining. These organizations shall not receive release time, rights, or representation on shared governance task forces, committees, or other governance groups exceeding that offered to the exclusive representative of classified employees.

(b) A local governing board shall determine a process for the selection of a classified staff representative to serve on those task forces, committees, or other governance groups in a situation where no exclusive representative exists.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 799, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

70901.5.

(a) The board of governors shall establish procedures for the adoption of rules and regulations governing the California Community Colleges. Among other matters, the procedures shall implement the following requirements:

(1) Written notice of a proposed action shall be provided to each community college district and to all other interested parties and individuals, including the educational policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature and the Department of Finance, at least 45 days in advance of adoption. The regulations shall become effective no earlier than 30 days after adoption.

(2) The proposed regulations shall be accompanied by an estimate, prepared in accordance with instructions adopted by the Department of Finance, of the effect of the proposed regulations with regard to the costs or savings to any state agency, the cost of any state-mandated local program as governed by Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code, any other costs or savings of local agencies, and the costs or savings in federal funding provided to state agencies.

(3) The board of governors shall ensure that all proposed regulations of the board meet the standards of “necessity,” “authority,” “clarity,” “consistency,” “reference,” and “nonduplication,” as those terms are defined in Section 11349 of the Government Code. A district governing board or any other interested party may challenge any proposed regulatory action regarding the application of these standards.

(4) Prior to the adoption of regulations, the board of governors shall consider and respond to all written and oral comments received during the comment period.

(5) The effective date for a regulation shall be suspended if, within 30 days after adoption by the board of governors, at least two-thirds of all governing boards vote, in open session, to disapprove the regulation. With respect to any regulation so disapproved, the board of governors shall provide at least 45 additional days for review, comment, and hearing, including at least one hearing before the board itself. After the additional period of review, comment, and hearing, the board may do any of the following:

(A) Reject or withdraw the regulation.

(B) Substantially amend the regulation to address the concerns raised during the additional review period, and then adopt the revised regulation. The regulation shall be treated as a newly adopted regulation, and shall go into effect in accordance with those procedures.

(C) Readopt the regulation as originally adopted, or with those nonsubstantive, technical amendments deemed necessary to clarify the intent of the original regulation. If the board of governors decides to readopt a regulation, with or without technical amendments, it shall also adopt a written declaration and determination regarding the specific state interests it has found necessary to protect by means of the specific language or requirements of the regulation. A readopted regulation may then be challenged pursuant to existing law in a court of competent jurisdiction, and shall not be subject to any further appeal within the California Community Colleges.

(6) As to any regulation which the Department of Finance determines would create a state-mandated local program cost, the board of governors shall not adopt the regulation until the Department of Finance has certified to the board of governors and to the Legislature that a source of funds is available to reimburse that cost.

(7) Any district or other interested party may propose a new regulation or challenge any existing regulation.

(b) Except as expressly provided by this section, and except as provided by resolution of the board of governors, the provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall not apply to regulations adopted by the board of governors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 973, Sec. 8.   Operative January 1, 1990, by Sec. 71 of Ch. 973.)
-------------------------------------------

70902.

(a) (1) Every community college district shall be under the control of a board of trustees, which is referred to herein as the “governing board.” The governing board of each community college district shall establish, maintain, operate, and govern one or more community colleges in accordance with law. In so doing, the governing board may initiate and carry on any program, activity, or may otherwise act in any manner that is not in conflict with or inconsistent with, or preempted by, any law and that is not in conflict with the purposes for which community college districts are established.

(2) The governing board of each community college district shall
 establish rules and regulations not inconsistent with the regulations of the board of governors and the laws of this state for the government and operation of one or more community colleges in the district.

(b) In furtherance of subdivision (a), the governing board of each community college district shall do all of the following:

(1) Establish policies for, and approve, current and long-range academic and facilities plans and programs and promote orderly growth and development of the community colleges within the district. In so doing, the governing board shall, as required by law, establish policies for, develop, and approve, comprehensive plans. The governing board shall submit the comprehensive plans to the board of governors for review and approval.

(2) Establish policies for and approve courses of instruction
 and educational programs. The educational programs shall be submitted to the board of governors for approval. Courses of instruction that are not offered in approved educational programs shall be submitted to the board of governors for approval. The governing board shall establish policies for, and approve, individual courses that are offered in approved educational programs, without referral to the board of governors.

(3) Establish academic standards, probation and dismissal and readmission policies, and graduation requirements not inconsistent with the minimum standards adopted by the board of governors.

(4) Employ and assign all personnel not inconsistent with the minimum standards adopted by the board of governors and establish employment practices, salaries, and benefits for all employees not inconsistent with the laws of this state.

(5) To the extent authorized by law, determine and control the district’s operational and capital outlay budgets. The district governing board shall determine the need for elections for override tax levies and bond measures and request that those elections be called.

(6) Manage and control district property. The governing board may contract for the procurement of goods and services as authorized by law.

(7) Establish procedures that are consistent with minimum standards established by the board of governors to ensure faculty, staff, and students the opportunity to express their opinions at the campus level, to ensure that these opinions are given every reasonable consideration, to ensure the right to participate effectively in district and college governance, and to ensure the right of academic senates to assume primary
 responsibility for making recommendations in the areas of curriculum and academic standards.

(8) Establish rules and regulations governing student conduct.

(9) Establish student fees as it is required to establish by law, and, in its discretion, fees as it is authorized to establish by law.

(10) In its discretion, receive and administer gifts, grants, and scholarships.

(11) Provide auxiliary services as deemed necessary to achieve the purposes of the community college.

(12) Within the framework provided by law, determine the district’s academic calendar, including the holidays it will observe.

(13) Hold and convey property
 for the use and benefit of the district. The governing board may acquire by eminent domain any property necessary to carry out the powers or functions of the district.

(14) Participate in the consultation process established by the board of governors for the development and review of policy proposals.

(c) In carrying out the powers and duties specified in subdivision (b) or other provisions of statute, the governing board of each community college district shall have full authority to adopt rules and regulations, not inconsistent with the regulations of the board of governors and the laws of this state, that are necessary and proper to executing these prescribed functions.

(d) Wherever in this section or any other statute a power is vested in the governing board, the governing board of a community college district,
 by majority vote, may adopt a rule delegating the power to the district’s chief executive officer or any other employee or committee as the governing board may designate. However, the governing board shall not delegate any power that is expressly made nondelegable by statute. Any rule delegating authority shall prescribe the limits of the delegation.

(e) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2014.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 817, Sec. 5) by Stats. 2011, Ch. 112, Sec. 4.   (AB 1029)   Effective January 1, 2012.   Section operative January 1, 2014, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 44. BOARD OF GOVERNORS [71000. - 71095.]



  CHAPTER 1. Board of Governors [71000. - 71095.]



  ARTICLE 1. Composition and Organization [71000. - 71004.]

71000.

There is in the state government a Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, consisting of 18 voting members, as follows:

(a) Twelve members, each appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of two-thirds of the membership of the Senate to six-year staggered terms. Two of these members shall be current or former elected members of local community college district governing boards.

(b) (1) (A) Two voting student members. Each student member may exercise the same right to attend meetings of the board, and its committees, and shall have the same right to vote as the members appointed pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (c).

(B) A student member shall be enrolled in a community college with a minimum of five semester units, or its equivalent, at the time of the appointment and throughout the period of the student member’s
 term, or until a replacement has been named. A student member shall be enrolled in a community college at least one semester before the student member’s appointment, and shall meet and maintain the minimum standards of scholarship prescribed for community college students.

(C) Each student member shall be appointed by the Governor from a list of names of at least three eligible persons submitted to the Governor by the student organization recognized by the board of governors.

(2) The term of office of one student member of the board shall commence on July 1 of an even-numbered year, and expire on June 30 two years thereafter. The term of office of the other student member of the board shall commence on July 1 of an odd-numbered year, and expire on June 30 two years thereafter. Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a student member who graduates from the student member’s college on or after January 1 of the second year of the student member’s term of office may
 serve the remainder of the term.

(c) Two voting tenured faculty members from a community college, who shall be appointed by the Governor for two-year terms. The Governor shall appoint each faculty member from a list of names of at least three eligible persons furnished by the Academic Senate of the California Community Colleges. Each seat designated as a tenured faculty member seat shall be filled by a tenured faculty member from a community college pursuant to this section and Section 71003.

(d) One voting classified employee, who shall be appointed by the Governor for a two-year term. The Governor shall
 appoint the classified employee member from a list of at least three eligible persons furnished by the exclusive representatives of classified employees of the California Community Colleges.

(e) The Lieutenant Governor, who shall be a voting member.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   (AB 337)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

71001.

(a) Except for the student member and the faculty members, the terms of office of the members of the board appointed by the Governor shall be as follows:

(1) To the terms expiring on January 15, 1990, the Governor shall appoint one person whose term shall expire on January 15, 1994; one current or former trustee whose term shall expire on January 15, 1996; and one other person whose term shall expire on January 15, 1996.

(2) To the terms expiring on January 15, 1991, the Governor shall appoint two persons whose terms shall expire on January 15, 1995; and two persons whose terms shall expire on January 15, 1997.

(3) To the terms expiring on January 15, 1992, the Governor shall appoint one person whose term shall expire on January 15, 1998; one current or former trustee whose term shall expire on January 15, 1998; and one person whose term shall expire on January 15, 1994.

(4) To the terms expiring on January 15, 1993, the Governor shall appoint three persons whose terms shall expire on January 15, 1999.

(5) Commencing January 15, 1993, all terms of office of the members of the board, except the terms of the student member and the faculty members appointed by the Governor, shall be six years.

(b) Each term of office shall commence at the expiration of the preceding term.

(c) A member whose term has expired may, in accordance with Section 1770 to 1780, inclusive, of the Government Code, continue to discharge the duties of the office until his or her successor is appointed by the Governor.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1071, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

71002.

(a) Members of the board shall be selected from outstanding lay citizens of California who have a strong interest in the further development and improvement of the California Community Colleges.

(b) Members of the board, to the greatest extent possible, should be inclusive and representative of the many demographic groups found in California, and the board should reflect diversity of race and gender, and should include, among others, disabled persons and veterans. In furtherance of the mission of the California Community Colleges, a member of the board should embrace the basic role and responsibility of a member of the board to bring his or her own best thinking and personal views to
 the board’s discussion, determining his or her own position on each issue rather than being bound to represent or advocate for the positions of a particular organization or constituency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 496, Sec. 1.   (AB 1557)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

71003.

(a) Except for the student members, the faculty members, and the classified employee member appointed by the Governor, any vacancy in an appointed position on the board shall be filled by appointment by the Governor, subject to confirmation by two-thirds of the membership of the Senate. A vacancy in the office of a student member, a faculty member, or the classified employee member shall be filled by appointment by the Governor.

(b) The appointee to fill a vacancy shall hold office only for the balance of the unexpired term.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 860, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

71004.

(a) Members of the board shall receive their actual and necessary traveling expenses while on official business. Each member shall also receive one hundred dollars ($100) for each day the member is attending to official business. The headquarters of the board and the chief executive officer shall be in Sacramento.

(b) The office of the
 Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall allocate, from funds appropriated for this purpose pursuant to Item 6870-001-0001 of Section 2.00 of the annual Budget Act, four thousand dollars ($4,000) in financial assistance to a student member of the board, as described in subdivision (b) of Section 71000, for each semester, or quarterly equivalent, of each year the student is a student member on the board. This financial assistance shall be in addition to any need-based financial assistance and any private grants and scholarships received by the student.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 50, Sec. 10.   (SB 117)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Powers and Duties [71020.5. - 71051.]

71020.5.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to foster the creation, implementation, and phase-in of a comprehensive community college accountability system that describes the performance of community colleges in meeting the postsecondary educational needs of students. This educational and fiscal accountability system shall provide performance data on students, programs, and institutions.

It is further the intent of the Legislature that this accountability system assist all participants in the community college system, including students, faculty, staff, administrators, local governing boards, the chancellor, the state board of governors, the public, and other interested constituencies, in identifying the educational and fiscal strengths and weaknesses of colleges in order to improve educational quality in community colleges.

(b) The board of governors shall develop and implement a comprehensive community college educational and fiscal accountability system. In developing and implementing this system, the board of governors shall solicit consultation from institutional and organizational representatives of the California Community Colleges, including statewide faculty and staff organizations. At a minimum, the system shall do all of the following:

(1) Be consistent with the Legislature’s intent as expressed in this act, Chapter 136 of the Statutes of 1987, and Chapter 1465 of the Statutes of 1986.

(2) Draw from, and build upon, the system proposed in the report entitled “AB 3409 Community College Accountability Report,” prepared pursuant to Chapter 1465 of the Statutes of 1986.

(3) Be designed to promote student success in community colleges.

(4) Define and measure, quantitatively and qualitatively, accountability information, including all of the following:

(A) Student access to community colleges.

(B) The extent to which the community college student body reflects proportionately the adult population of the state.

(C) Student transfer rates and programs.

(D) Academic standards and student achievement.

(E) Student goal satisfaction and success in courses and programs.

(F) Completion rates of courses and programs.

(G) Occupational preparation relative to state and local work force needs and for entry-level employment, occupational advancement, and career changes of students.

(H) Adequacy of basic skills and English as a second language courses and instruction in preparing students to succeed in collegiate level work.

(I) Adequacy of, and student satisfaction with, student services.

(J) The extent to which the community college work force reflects proportionately the adult population of the state.

(K) Fiscal conditions of community college districts.

(5) Be designed to streamline the use of multiple performance measures from appropriate sources of data, including, but not limited to, matriculation evaluations, categorical program evaluations, the community college management information system, and other existing data collection and evaluation systems.

(6) Provide feedback to individual colleges in order to improve access to community colleges, student performance, and educational programs where needed.

(7) Produce a published report of community college accountability.

(c) The Legislature finds and declares that successful implementation of a comprehensive educational and fiscal accountability system is, in part, dependent upon an adequate data collection and reporting system. The accountability system developed and implemented pursuant to this section shall be phased in, to the extent necessary, with the funding and local implementation of the community college management information system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 80.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

71021.

All official acts of the board shall require the affirmative vote of a majority of the board, as determined by the policies of the board. The vote of all members shall be recorded.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1071, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

71022.

All meetings of the board shall be open and public except as otherwise provided.

The board may hold executive sessions closed to the public to consider the employment of any person, or the dismissal or other form of disciplinary action to be taken against any officer or employee under the jurisdiction of the board, except where that person, officer, or employee requests a public hearing. The employment status of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges is subject to this authority of the board. The board may exclude from that meeting, whether public or closed to the public, during the examination of a witness, any or all other witnesses in the matter being investigated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1123, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

71024.

The Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges has the duties, powers, purposes, responsibilities, and jurisdiction heretofore vested in the State Board of Education, Superintendent of Public Instruction, the Department of Education, and the Director of Education with respect to the management, administration, and control of the community colleges.

Whenever in any law other than a provision of the Education Code, enacted prior to January 1, 1977, relating to the management, administration and control of the community colleges reference is made to the State Board of Education, Superintendent of Public Instruction, the Department of Education, or the Director of Education, such reference shall be deemed to mean the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

71025.

(a) The name “California Community Colleges” is the property of the state. No person shall, without permission of the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, use this name, or any abbreviation of it, or any name of which these words are a part in any of the following ways:

(1) To designate any business, social, political, religious, or other organization, including but not limited to, any corporation, firm, partnership, association, group, activity or enterprise.

(2) To imply, indicate or otherwise suggest that any organization, or any product or service of that organization, is connected or affiliated with, or is endorsed, favored or supported by, or is opposed by one or more California Community Colleges, the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, or the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.

(3) To display, advertise, or announce these names publicly at or in connection with any meeting, assembly, or demonstration, or any propaganda, advertising or promotional activity of any kind which has for its purpose or any part of its purpose the support, endorsement, advancement, opposition or defeat of any strike, lockout, or boycott or of any political, religious, sociological, or economic movement, activity or program.

The provisions of this section shall not preclude the use of the name “California Community Colleges” by any person or organization otherwise subject to this section using the name immediately prior to March 4, 1972.

(b) Nothing in this section shall interfere with or restrict the right of any person to make a true and accurate statement in the course of stating his or her experience or qualifications for any academic, governmental, business, or professional credit or enrollment, or in connection with any academic, governmental, professional or other employment whatsoever.

(c) Every person violating provisions of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 266.)
-------------------------------------------

71027.

(a) The Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges shall develop, maintain, and disseminate a general common course numbering system for use by the community college districts.

(b) The office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall absorb the costs of developing, maintaining, and disseminating a general common course numbering system pursuant to this section within the office’s existing resources.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 193, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

71028.

The board of governors shall adopt regulations to ensure that the California Community Colleges, as a system, establish and apply the statewide participation goals for contracting with minority business enterprises and women business enterprises specified in Section 10115 of the Public Contract Code. The statewide participation goal for the California Community Colleges shall be based upon the total dollar amount of contracts awarded, with not less than 15 percent being awarded to minority business enterprises, and not less than 5 percent being awarded to women business enterprises. The regulations adopted by the board of governors shall be adapted from and consistent with the provisions of Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 10115) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of the Public Contract Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 745, Sec. 36.   Effective October 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

71029.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, in cooperation with the Trustees of the California State University and Colleges and the Regents of the University of California, may support existing and additional programs which provide postsecondary educational opportunities and services for prison inmates, wards, and parolees of the Department of Corrections and the Department of the Youth Authority. The board of governors may support programs developed and operated cooperatively by at least one correctional institution and a two- or four-year college. Priority shall be given to programs linking more than two correctional institutions, educational agencies, parolee programs, community agencies, and potential employers. The board of governors may support existing programs and additional demonstration projects which have one or more of the following components:

(a) Academic and vocational instructional programs at the postsecondary educational level offered inside state prisons, county jails, or Department of the Youth Authority institutions.

(b) Information, counseling, and tutoring services for inmates, wards, and ex-offenders presently enrolled or interested in a postsecondary educational program.

(c) Courses for inmates and wards which also serve prison personnel and college students who are not incarcerated.

(d) Cooperative efforts linking postsecondary education programs with potential employers of ex-offenders.

(e) Research on alternative methods of assessing academic abilities of inmates and alternative ways of making available education to inmates and ex-offenders.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 470, Sec. 40.)
-------------------------------------------

71030.

On or before July 31, 2019, the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall revise the California community college online application process so that only data that is required by the federal government or state law, or that is otherwise necessary, as determined by the chancellor, is collected during the process. To the extent that data can be collected from the student at a later time, the chancellor may delay the collection of that data until after the student has applied to a community college.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 83.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

71040.

The board of governors may allow actual and necessary travel expenses to community college students, faculty, staff, or other community college officials or employees who serve on study teams, task forces, or similar groups formed by the board of governors or by the chancellor’s office and who, in these capacities, attend meetings of any association, organization, or agency that has as its principal purpose the study of matters pertinent to education or to a particular field or fields of education relevant to community colleges.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 654, Sec. 2.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

71046.

The Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges may accept on behalf of, and in the name of, the state gifts, donations, bequests, and devises that may be made to the board of governors, or to any school or other institution under the jurisdiction of the board of governors whenever the gift, donation, bequest, or devise and the terms and conditions thereof, will aid the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges in carrying out its primary functions, as specified in Sections 70900 to 70902, inclusive. Gifts, donations, bequests, and devises may be made subject to the conditions or restrictions as the board of governors may deem advisable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 275.)
-------------------------------------------

71049.

For the purposes of Government Code Section 11032, the following constitute, among other proper purposes of like or different character, state business for officers and employees of the board of governors and the chancellor’s office for which the officers and employees shall be allowed actual and necessary traveling expenses:

(a) Attending meetings of any national association or organization having as its principal purpose the study of matters relating to education or to a particular field or fields of education, or any agency of such association.

(b) Conferring with officers or employees of the United States, or appearing before committees of either house of the Congress of the United States, relative to problems relating to education in California.

(c) Conferring with officers or employees of other states engaged in the performance of similar duties.

(d) Obtaining information useful to the agency in the conduct of its work.

When traveling is outside the state, traveling and expense shall be approved by the Governor and Director of Finance as provided in Government Code Section 11032.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

71050.
